Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin KARI DZIEDZIC SENATE BUILDING.new text end new text begin The Minnesota Senate Building located at 95 University Avenue West in the city of St. Paul is renamed as the Kari Dziedzic Senate Building. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SIGNAGE CHANGES FOR KARI DZIEDZIC SENATE BUILDING.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to replace signs in the Capitol complex to reflect the change of name of the Minnesota Senate Building to the Kari Dziedzic Senate Building, as required in section 1. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must replace "Minnesota Senate Building" with "the Kari Dziedzic Senate Building" wherever it appears in Minnesota Statutes and Minnesota Rules. new text end